Utah statutes.
49-11-622.   Subsidiaries or other companies owned by independent
corporations -- Participation -- Withdrawal.
(1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an independent
corporation, as defined in Section 63E-1-102, which participates in a system
or plan prior to July 1, 2006, and which owns a subsidiary, or other company
may provide for the participation of employees with that system or plan as
follows:
(a)  the independent corporation shall determine a date that is no later than
January 1, 2007, on which the independent corporation shall make an election
under Subsection (2);
(b)  an employee hired by the independent corporation and transferred to a
subsidiary, or other company on or after the date set under Subsection (1)(a)
may not participate in a system or plan; and
(c)  the independent corporation shall pay to the office any actuarial or
administrative cost, determined by the office, to have arisen out of the
transfer of the employees from the independent corporation.
(2)  The independent corporation described under Subsection (1) shall elect
to:
(a)  continue its participation for all current employees covered by a system
or plan and transferred to a subsidiary, or other company, as of the date set
under Subsection (1)(a); or
(b)  withdraw from participation in all systems or plans for all employees
covered by a system or plan and transferred to the subsidiary, or other
company, as of the date set under Subsection (1)(a).
(3)  If an independent corporation elects to continue participation under
Subsection (2)(a), the independent corporation and the transferred employees
shall continue to be subject to the laws and the rules governing the system or
plan in which the employee participates, including the accrual of service
credit and payment of contributions.
